Connecticut, session 2026, SB00419.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. Section 16-244b of the general statutes is repealed and the
2 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
3 [All customers of] On and after July 1, 2000, any customer of an
4 electric distribution [companies] company, as defined in section 16-1,
5 shall have the opportunity to purchase electric generation services from
6 [their] the customer's choice of electric suppliers, as defined in section
7 16-1, in a competitive generation market. [in accordance with the
8 schedule provided in this section. As of July 1, 2000, all customers shall
9 have the opportunity to choose an electric supplier.] On and after
10 January 1, 2000, electric generation services shall be provided in
11 accordance with section 16-244c to any customer who has not chosen an
12 electric supplier or has declined, failed or been unable to enter into or
13 maintain a contract for electric generation services with an electric
14 supplier. The Public Utilities Regulatory Authority may adopt
15 regulations, in accordance with chapter 54, to implement the [phase-in
SB419 / File No. 469 1

SB419 File No. 469
16 schedule provided in] provisions of this section.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 16-244b
ET Joint Favorable
SB419 / File No. 469 2

SB419 File No. 469
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill makes various technical changes to retail electric suppliers in
the state and has no fiscal impact.
The Out Years
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
SB419 / File No. 469 3

SB419 File No. 469
OLR Bill Analysis
SB 419
AN ACT CONCERNING SUPPLIERS OF ELECTRICITY.